Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-201.02
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that the election of the city council at large in cities of the metropolitan class denies representation to some socioeconomic segments of the population. The Legislature further finds and declares that fair and adequate representation of all areas and all socioeconomic segments of the population of cities of the metropolitan class is a matter of general statewide concern, the provisions of any home rule charter notwithstanding.

Laws 1979, LB 329, § 1.

The primary concern of this statute is to insure proportionate representation to every socioeconomic segment of the population of a metropolitan class city. This statute was enacted to protect the right to vote, which is a legitimate matter of statewide concern for which the Legislature may act without violating Neb. Const., art. XI, § 5, concerning home rule charters. Jacobberger v. Terry, 211 Neb. 878, 320 N.W.2d 903 (1982).